Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 278, O.S.L. 2023
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 28-100), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. REPEALER Section 3, Chapter 279, O.S.L. 2023
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 28-100a), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. REPEALER Section 2, Chapter 278, O.S.L. 2023,
as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 295, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 28-101), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. REPEALER Section 3, Chapter 278, O.S.L. 2023
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 28-102), is hereby repealed.

Req. No. 15181 Page 1

SECTION 5. REPEALER Section 4, Chapter 278, O.S.L. 2023
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 28-103), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15181 AO 01/05/26



















Req. No. 15181 Page 2